Nebraska, session 109, LB388.
Be it enacted by the people of the State of Nebraska,
Section 1. Section 24-802, Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska, is
amended to read:
24-802 Except for the judge of the Supreme Court who is required to be a
member of a judicial nominating commission, each member or alternate member of
a commission shall be a resident of the judicial district or area of the state
served by such commission except as provided in subsection (2) of section
24-806. Except for the Chief Justice, the member of the Supreme Court
designated to serve on a particular nominating commission shall not be a member
who was originally selected from the district served by such nominating
commission.
Sec. 2. Section 24-803, Revised Statutes Cumulative Supplement, 2024, is
amended to read:
24-803 (1) Except as provided in subsection (3) of this section, as the
term of a member of a judicial nominating commission initially appointed or
selected expires, the term of office of each successor member shall be for a
period of four years. The Governor shall appoint all successor members of each
nominating commission who are judges of the Supreme Court and citizen members
or alternate citizen members. The Governor shall appoint two alternate citizen
members, not of the same political party, to each nominating commission. The
term of office of an alternate citizen member of a commission shall be for a
period of four years except that the initial appointments shall terminate on
December 31, 1999. The lawyers residing in the judicial district or area of the
state served by a judicial nominating commission shall select all successor and
alternate lawyer members of such commission in the manner prescribed in section
24-806. The term of office of an alternate lawyer member of a commission shall
be for a period of four years. No member of any nominating commission,
including the Supreme Court member of any such commission, shall serve more
than a total of twelve eight consecutive years as a member of the commission,
and if such member has served for more than ten six years as a member of the
commission, he or she shall not be eligible for reelection or reappointment.
Alternate lawyer and citizen members shall be selected to fill vacancies in
their order of election or appointment.
(2) For purposes of this section and Article V, section 21, of the
Constitution of Nebraska, a member of a judicial nominating commission shall be
deemed to have served on such commission if he or she was a member of the
commission at the time of the publication of the notice required by subsection
(1) of section 24-810.
(3) Members of the judicial nominating commissions for the office of judge
of the district court shall also serve as members of the judicial nominating
commissions for the office of judge of the county court for counties located
within the district court judicial districts served, except that members of the
judicial nominating commissions for district judge and county judge in
districts 1, 2, 3, 4, and 10 shall be appointed or selected separately to serve
on such commissions.
Sec. 3. Section 24-805, Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska, is amended
to read:
24-805 In conformity with the residency requirements of section 24-802,
Except for the Supreme Court members of judicial nominating commissions, no
individual lawyer or citizen members member of any judicial nominating
commission may shall serve on more than one judicial nominating commission at
the same time. ; Provided, judicial nominating commissioners for the office of
district judge may also serve as judicial nominating commissioners for county
judge.
Sec. 4. Section 24-806, Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska, is amended
to read:
24-806 (1)(a) (1) Lawyer members and alternate lawyer members of any
judicial nominating commission shall be active members of the bar of the State
of Nebraska, and shall reside in the judicial district or area of the state
served by the commission, and shall be registered to vote except as provided in
subsection (2) of this section. Not more than two lawyer members of each
commission shall be registered members of the same political party or category,
and not more than two alternate lawyer members shall be registered members of
-1-

LB388 LB388
2025 2025
the same political party or category. Nominations for lawyer members of each
commission may shall be solicited and received electronically via the Supreme
Court's attorney licensure portal on or before October 1 of each even-numbered
year. in writing by the Clerk of the Supreme Court from all the lawyers of the
district or area served on or before September 1 of each even-numbered year.
Nominations of lawyer members shall be made in writing and filed in the office
of the Clerk of the Supreme Court on or before October 1 of each even-numbered
year. Each nomination of a lawyer member shall be accompanied by a written
consent of the nominee to serve as a member of the commission if elected.
(b) The nominations shall be listed solicited and distributed on the
ballot by the Clerk of the Supreme Court:
(i) From from the legally recognized political parties or be listed as
nonpartisan; and
(ii) In in such a manner as will permit the final selection to be made in
conformity with Article V, section 21, of the Constitution of Nebraska within
the required political party.
(2) If, on October 1 of an even-numbered year, solicited nominations are
insufficient to provide candidates from the permissible political parties for
each vacancy, the Executive Council of the Nebraska State Bar Association ,
within ten days after the last day for filing nominations, shall nominate
additional candidates for the position so that there shall be a qualified
candidate for each position. Such nominations shall be made on or before
November 1 of such year. Such candidates need not reside in the judicial
district or area served by such judicial nominating commission.
(3) The Clerk of the Supreme Court shall mail or electronically deliver a
ballot with the name of each nominee to all members of the bar of Nebraska
residing in the judicial district or area designating a date at least ten days
and not more than thirty fourteen days after the date of such mailing or
electronic delivery by the Clerk of the Supreme Court when the ballots will be
opened and counted. The ballots shall be counted by a board consisting of the
Clerk of the Supreme Court, the Secretary of State, and the Attorney General or
by alternates designated by any of them to serve in his or her place. Whether
conducted electronically or by mail, the The Clerk of the Supreme Court shall
ensure insure that the election is so conducted as to maintain the secrecy of
the ballot and the validity of the results. The candidate of the required
political party receiving the highest number of votes shall be considered as
having been elected to the commission. The candidate of the required political
party receiving the next highest number of votes shall be considered as having
been elected an alternate lawyer member of the commission and shall serve as a
lawyer member of the commission in the event of a lawyer member vacancy of the
same political party or category on the commission created either by
resignation or disqualification. In the case of a resignation, an alternate
lawyer member shall continue to serve as a member of the commission until the
term of office of his or her predecessor expires.
(4) In any election when more than one lawyer member of a judicial
nominating commission is to be elected, the nominees shall be submitted without
designation of the term. Each voter shall be instructed to vote for as many
nominees as there are vacancies to be filled. The candidate receiving the
highest number of votes shall be considered as having been elected for the
longest term. The candidate receiving the next highest number of votes shall be
deemed to have been elected for next to the longest term, and if an alternate
lawyer member or members are to be elected, the candidate or candidates
receiving the third and fourth highest number of votes shall be deemed elected
as the alternate lawyer member or members. In case of ties the determination
shall be made by lot by the counting board.
Sec. 5. Section 24-808, Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska, is amended
to read:
24-808 (1) A vacancy Each year, on or before September 1, the Clerk of the
Supreme Court shall determine what, if any, vacancies exist on any judicial
nominating commission and shall report the status of each judicial nominating
commission to the Governor. Vacancies relating to any member members or
alternate citizen member members of a judicial nominating commission such
commissions appointed by the Governor shall be filled promptly by appointment
by the Governor for the unexpired term.
(2) A vacancy Vacancies of a lawyer member caused by resignation shall be
filled promptly with the alternate lawyer member of the same political party
for the unexpired term. If an alternate lawyer member of the same political
party does not exist, then an alternate lawyer member not affiliated with any
political party may fill the vacancy. If there are no alternates who meet such
requirements, the Clerk of the Supreme Court shall use the certified election
results of the previous election and move up the alternate member who had the
highest number of votes in the previous election who would not otherwise
conflict with the requirements of Article V, section 21, of the Constitution of
Nebraska, to balance political party membership. members or
(3) A vacancy of an alternate lawyer member for an unexpired term members
of the judicial nominating commission shall be filled promptly by the Executive
Council of the Nebraska State Bar Association upon notification by the Clerk of
the Supreme Court as to the required number of vacancies and the required
political party affiliation or nonpartisan designation. The Executive Council
shall designate sufficient lawyers to fill the vacancies who meet the
requirements of subsection (1) of section 24-806. a special election for the
unexpired term, conducted by the Clerk of the Supreme Court in the manner
applicable to the regular election of lawyer members of the commissions.
-2-

LB388 LB388
2025 2025
Sec. 6. Section 24-809, Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska, is amended
to read:
24-809 (1) The judge of the Supreme Court on each judicial nominating
commission shall be the chairperson of the commission and shall preside at all
of its meetings. He or she shall not be entitled to vote. In selecting or
rejecting judicial nominees, the members of the commission shall vote by oral
roll call vote. When it is determined that a judicial vacancy exists in a
particular district, the chairperson of the commission shall determine whether
there will be eight qualified members of the appropriate judicial nominating
commission, including alternate members.
(2) If it is determined that there will not be eight members present and
capable of voting at the time the commission meets to vote, the chairperson of
the commission shall inform the Governor of the number of citizen members which
need to be appointed and shall inform the Executive Director of the Nebraska
State Bar Association of the number of alternate lawyer members which need to
be designated elected. The Governor shall promptly make such number of citizen
appointments as are necessary. The Executive Council of the Nebraska State Bar
Association shall appoint each alternate lawyer member in the same manner as in
section 24-808. nominate at least one lawyer candidate for each vacancy on the
nominating commission which needs to be filled. If the Executive Council is
unable, with reasonable effort, to obtain a sufficient number of candidates for
each vacancy, it may nominate candidates who do not reside in the judicial
district or area served by such nominating commission. The nominations shall be
sent to the Clerk of the Supreme Court, and the lawyer vacancies shall be
filled by election as provided in section 24-806.
(3) Vacancies of lawyer members or alternate lawyer members caused by
disqualification or inability to serve at a particular commission meeting shall
be considered temporary and shall be filled as provided in this section but
service as a member or alternate member shall cease after the commission sends
the names of the candidates to the Governor.
(4) There shall be eight qualified commission members present and capable
of voting at the time the vote is taken. In the event that a nominating
commission public hearing is postponed due to the lack of a full complement of
commission members entitled to vote, the time limits specified in subsection
(4) of section 24-810 shall be extended for an additional thirty days for each
such postponement. The chairperson of the commission shall cause appropriate
notice of the time and place of the newly scheduled judicial nominating
commission public hearing to be published as provided in subsection (1) of
section 24-810. The postponement of a commission hearing shall not extend the
initial application filing deadline of twenty-one days prior to the initial
public hearing. Each candidate shall receive five votes from the voting members
of the nominating commission to have his or her name submitted to the Governor.
Sec. 7. Section 24-810, Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska, is amended
to read:
24-810 (1)(a) (1) When a final determination of a district, county, or
separate juvenile court judicial vacancy has been made pursuant to section
24-809.04 or in the event of a judicial vacancy in any other court, the Clerk
of the Supreme Court shall contact the chairperson of the judicial nominating
commission relating to such vacancy and shall ascertain from him or her a time
and place for the first meeting of such judicial nominating commission, at
which time a public hearing will be held.
(b) The first public hearing shall be held within sixty days after final
determination of the vacancy occurs. The chairperson shall notify each
commission member in writing of the time and place of the meeting and shall
also cause appropriate notice to be published by various news media of the time
and place of the public hearing of the judicial nominating commission and of
the interest of the commission in receiving applications from information
relating to qualified candidates for the judicial vacancy.
(c) Any lawyer meeting the statutory requirements to serve as a judge who
is interested in being nominated and appointed to such judgeship shall signify
his or her interest by filing the appropriate application with the proper
entity at least twenty-one days prior to the public hearing.
(d) Any lawyer member or alternate lawyer member of the commission
interested in being nominated for the judgeship that is the subject of the
notice of public hearing and application deadline shall, in order to be
eligible for nomination, resign as a member or alternate member of the
commission before the publication of such notice.
(e) At least ten days prior to the public hearing, the chairperson shall
cause to be released release to the public the names of all lawyers who have
applied for such judgeship. Any member of the public shall be entitled to
attend the public hearing to express, either orally or in writing, his or her
views concerning candidates for the judicial vacancy.
(2) After the public hearing, the judicial nominating commission shall
hold such additional private or confidential meetings as it determines to be
necessary. Additional information may be submitted in writing to the commission
at any time prior to its selection of qualified candidates to fill the vacancy.
The commission shall make such independent investigation and inquiry as it
considers necessary or expedient to determine the qualifications of candidates
for the judicial vacancy and shall take such action as it deems necessary or
expedient to encourage qualified candidates to accept judicial office or
nomination for judicial office.
(3) The judicial nominating commission may, before or after the hearing
provided for in subsection (1) of this section, institute a search for
-3-

LB388 LB388
2025 2025
additional candidates. If additional candidates are obtained, the commission
shall hold further public hearings in the same manner as provided in such
subsection.
(4) The names of candidates shall be submitted to the Governor within
ninety days after the date a final determination has been made of a district,
county, or separate juvenile court judicial vacancy or, in the event of a
judicial vacancy in any other court, after a judicial vacancy occurred if one
public hearing is held and within one hundred twenty days if more than one
public hearing is held.
Sec. 8. Section 24-810.01, Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska, is
amended to read:
24-810.01 A change in residency that results in a member not satisfying
the residency requirements of section 24-802 (1) For purposes of sections
24-801 to 24-812.01, members and prospective members of judicial nominating
commissions who are registered as independent voters shall be considered to be
members of the same political party. (2) Removal from the State of Nebraska or
a change in party registration shall automatically terminate the tenure of any
member of a judicial nominating commission.
Sec. 9. Original sections 24-802, 24-805, 24-806, 24-808, 24-809, 24-810,
and 24-810.01, Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska, and section 24-803,
Revised Statutes Cumulative Supplement, 2024, are repealed.
-4-